Washington statutes.
RCW 9.02.900

Construction—1992 c 1 (Initiative Measure No. 120).

RCW 9.02.100 through 9.02.170 and 9.02.900 through 9.02.902 shall not be construed to define the state's interest in the fetus for any purpose other than the specific provisions of RCW 9.02.100 through 9.02.170 and 9.02.900 through 9.02.902.

[ 1992 c 1 s 10 (Initiative Measure No. 120, approved November 5, 1991).]